Utah statutes.
78A-6-322.   Abuse, neglect, or dependency of child -- Coordination of proceedings.

(1)  In each case where an information or indictment has been filed against a defendant concerning abuse, neglect, or dependency of a child, and a petition has been filed in juvenile court concerning the victim, the appropriate county attorney's or district attorney's office shall coordinate with the attorney general's office.

(2)  Law enforcement personnel, Division of Child and Family Services personnel, the appointed guardian ad litem, pretrial services personnel, and corrections personnel shall make reasonable efforts to facilitate the coordination required by this section.

(3)  Members of interdisciplinary child protection teams, established under Section 62A-4a-409, may participate in the coordination required by this section.

